California, session 20252026, AB569.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7522.18 of the Government Code is amended to read:7522.18. (a) A public employer that does not offer a supplemental defined benefit plan before January 1, 2013, shall not offer a supplemental defined benefit plan for any employee on or after January 1, 2013.(b) A public employer that provides a supplemental defined benefit plan, including a defined benefit plan offered by a private provider, before January 1, 2013, shall not offer a supplemental defined benefit plan to any additional employee group to which the plan was not provided before January 1, 2013.(c) Except as provided in Chapter 38 (commencing with Section 25000) of Article 1 of Part 13 of Title 1 of the Education Code, a public employer shall not offer or provide a supplemental defined benefit plan, including a defined benefit plan offered by a private provider, to any employee hired on or after January 1, 2013.(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a A public employer, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (i) of Section 7522.04, may bargain over contributions for supplemental retirement benefits administered by, or on behalf of, an exclusive bargaining representative of one or more of the public employer’s bargaining units. units, subject to the limitations set forth in this section.